Illinois, session 104th, SB3861.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 11-204 and 11-204.1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-204)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-204)7    Sec. 11-204. Fleeing or attempting to elude a peace 8officer. 9    (a) Any driver or operator of a motor vehicle who, having 10been given a visual or audible signal by a peace officer 11directing such driver or operator to bring his vehicle to a 12stop, wilfully fails or refuses to obey such direction, 13increases his speed, extinguishes his lights, or otherwise 14flees or attempts to elude the officer, is guilty of a Class 4 15felony A misdemeanor. The signal given by the peace officer 16may be by hand, voice, siren, red or blue light. Provided, the 17officer giving such signal shall be in police uniform, and, if 18driving a vehicle, such vehicle shall display illuminated 19oscillating, rotating or flashing red or blue lights which 20when used in conjunction with an audible horn or siren would 21indicate the vehicle to be an official police vehicle. Such 22requirement shall not preclude the use of amber or white 23oscillating, rotating or flashing lights in conjunction with   SB3861- 2 -LRB104 18879 LNS 32324 b1red or blue oscillating, rotating or flashing lights as 2required in Section 12-215 of Chapter 12.3    (b) Upon receiving notice of such conviction the Secretary 4of State shall suspend the drivers license of the person so 5convicted for a period of not more than 6 months for a first 6conviction and not more than 12 months for a second 7conviction.8    (c) A third or subsequent violation of this Section is a 9Class 3 4 felony.10(Source: P.A. 93-120, eff. 1-1-04.) 11    (625 ILCS 5/11-204.1)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-204.1)12    Sec. 11-204.1. Aggravated fleeing or attempting to elude a 13peace officer.14    (a) The offense of aggravated fleeing or attempting to 15elude a peace officer is committed by any driver or operator of 16a motor vehicle who flees or attempts to elude a peace officer, 17after being given a visual or audible signal by a peace officer 18in the manner prescribed in subsection (a) of Section 11-204 19of this Code, and such flight or attempt to elude:20        (1) is at a rate of speed at least 21 miles per hour 21    over the legal speed limit;22        (2) causes bodily injury to any individual;23        (3) causes damage in excess of $300 to property;24        (4) involves disobedience of 2 or more official 25    traffic control devices; or  SB3861- 3 -LRB104 18879 LNS 32324 b1        (5) involves the concealing or altering of the 2    vehicle's registration plate or digital registration 3    plate. 4    (b) Any person convicted of a first violation of this 5Section shall be guilty of a Class 3 4 felony. Upon notice of 6such a conviction the Secretary of State shall forthwith 7revoke the driver's license of the person so convicted, as 8provided in Section 6-205 of this Code. Any person convicted 9of a second or subsequent violation of this Section shall be 10guilty of a Class 2 3 felony, and upon notice of such a 11conviction the Secretary of State shall forthwith revoke the 12driver's license of the person convicted, as provided in 13Section 6-205 of the Code.14    (c) The motor vehicle used in a violation of this Section 15is subject to seizure and forfeiture as provided in Sections 1636-1 and 36-2 of the Criminal Code of 2012.17(Source: P.A. 101-395, eff. 8-16-19.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.